Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 1 General Provisions as to Civil Actions

Law reviews. —

For comments, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Counterclaim, Recoupment and Setoff § 1 et seq.; 20 Am. Jur. 2d Courts § 1 et seq.; 42 Am. Jur. 2d Infants §§ 150 to 224; 73 Am. Jur. 2d Statutes §§ 27, 95, 96.

Nature of termination of civil action required to satisfy element of favorable termination to support action for malicious prosecution, 30 ALR4th 572.

Assignability of proceeds of claim for personal injury or death, 33 ALR4th 82.

Assignability of claim for legal malpractice, 40 ALR4th 684.

What constitutes “suit” triggering insurer's duty to defend environmental claims — state cases, 48 ALR5th 355.

Medical-malpractice countersuits, 61 ALR5th 307.

1A C.J.S. Actions §§ 1 to 45.

§ 1-1-101.
Provisions to be liberally construed.

The Code of Civil Procedure
[this title] and all proceedings under it shall be liberally construed
to promote its object and assist the parties in obtaining justice.
The rule of common law that statutes in derogation thereof must be
strictly construed has no application to the Code of Civil Procedure,
but this shall not be so construed as to require a liberal construction
of provisions affecting personal liberty, relating to amercement or
of a penal nature.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 2338; R.S. 1899, § 2727; C.S. 1910, § 4263; C.S. 1920, § 5532; R.S. 1931, § 89-102; C.S. 1945, § 3-102; W.S. 1957, § 1-2; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

In general. —

Under this section the Code of Civil Procedure will be liberally construed to promote its object and assist parties in obtaining justice, the common law rule that statutes in derogation thereof must be strictly construed being inapplicable. Allen v. Houn, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Petition to set aside fraudulent conveyance should be construed liberally

in order to promote the objects of the Code of Civil Procedure and to assist the parties in obtaining justice. Glover v. Berger, 75 Wyo. 191, 294 P.2d 793,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1956).

Likewise, petition for money had and received

on an oral contract for the sale of realty breached by the vendor should be construed liberally in order to promote justice. Smith v. Gorsuch, 36 Wyo. 430, 256 P. 664,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1927).

And occupying claimant's statute

should be construed in its entirety and liberally in order to promote its objects and assist the parties in obtaining justice. Walther v. Steward, 54 Wyo. 160, 88 P.2d 475,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1939).

Sufficiency of evidence to support finding

could be reviewed under an assignment of error challenging the sufficiency of the evidence to sustain “judgment.” Schiller v. Blyth & Fargo Co., 15 Wyo. 304, 88 P. 648,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1907).

Practice of other states not controlling. —

Courts of this state are not controlled by principles of practice established in other jurisdictions, unless they are more reasonable and consonant with other rules of our procedure, either judicially established or prescribed by statute. Hall Oil Co. v. Barquin, 33 Wyo. 92, 237 P. 255,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1925).

Quoted

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Ridenour, 623 P.2d 1174,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 287

(Wyo. 1981); Soles v. State, 809 P.2d 772,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 1-1-102.
Minors as parties to actions.

Every person over fourteen
(14) years of age and under the age of majority, when subject to no
disability other than being a minor, may sue or be sued. When plaintiff
he shall sue by a next friend selected by him before suit is commenced.
The next friend is liable for the cost chargeable to the plaintiff.
When the minor is sued he shall appear by guardian nominated by him
and appointed by the court before further proceedings are had in the
case, but judgment shall be against the minor defendant only. In either
case, if plaintiff or defendant neglects or refuses to nominate a
next friend or guardian, the court shall appoint a next friend or
guardian, who shall file his consent in writing, with the court.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 9; R.S. 1887, § 3423; R.S. 1899, § 4332; C.S. 1910, § 5194; C.S. 1920, § 6470; R.S. 1931, § 62-303; C.S. 1945, § 14-203; W.S. 1957, § 1-509; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision reserving rights of minors in judgments or orders, see §

1-16-101

.

As to right of minor to obtain declaration of rights under Uniform Declaratory Judgments Act, see §

1-37-105

.

As to appointment of guardians generally, see §§

3-2-101

to

3-2-112

.

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Quoted in

Kordus v. Montes, 2014 WY 146,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Nov.
14, 2014).

Cited

in

Cheeseman v. Fenton, 13 Wyo. 436, 80 P. 823,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(1905).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Minors as subject to constructive or substituted service of process under statutes providing for such service on nonresident motorist, 53 ALR2d 1164.

Recognition of foreign guardian as next friend or guardian ad litem, 94 ALR2d 162.

Who is minor's next of kin for guardianship purposes, 63 ALR3d 813.

Child's right of action for loss of support, training, parental attention, or the like, against a third person negligently injuring parent, 11 ALR4th 549.

Sexual child abuser's civil liability to child's parent, 54 ALR4th 93.

Parent's right to recover for loss of consortium in connection with injury to child, 54 ALR4th 112.

§ 1-1-103.
Power of deputies.

A duty enjoined by statute
upon a ministerial officer or an act permitted to be done by him may
be performed by his lawful deputy.

History.

Laws 1880, ch. 60, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 2339; R.S. 1899, § 3421; C.S. 1910, § 4264; C.S. 1920, § 5533; R.S. 1931, § 89-103; C.S. 1945, § 3-103; W.S. 1957, § 1-3; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to deputies of state officers, see §

9-1-101

.

As to deputies of county officers, see §§

18-3-111

,

18-3-112

.

§ 1-1-104.
Sureties; justification.

A court or an officer
authorized by law to approve a surety may require such person to testify
orally or in writing touching his sufficiency, but this in itself
shall not exonerate the officer in an action for taking insufficient
surety.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 2342; R.S. 1899, § 3424; C.S. 1910, § 4267; C.S. 1920, § 5536; R.S. 1931, § 89-106; C.S. 1945, § 3-105; W.S. 1957, § 1-4; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to rights and remedies of sureties, surety bonds and surety companies, see title 38.

§ 1-1-105.
Sureties; qualifications.

Sureties shall be residents
of this state, worth in the aggregate double the sum to be secured,
beyond the amount of their debts, and have property liable to execution
in this state equal to the sum to be secured. Every person acting
as surety for another shall file with the court his affidavit showing
that he meets the requirements set forth herein.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 7; R.S. 1899, § 3425; C.S. 1910, § 4268; C.S. 1920, § 5537; R.S. 1931, § 89-107; C.S. 1945, § 3-106; W.S. 1957, § 1-5; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to qualifications of sureties with reference to county officers, see §

18-3-102

.

Cited

in

Snake River Land Co. v. Utah-Idaho Sugar Co., 57 Wyo. 425, 120 P.2d 601,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(1942).

§ 1-1-106.
Compensation of cross demands.

When cross demands exist
between persons under circumstances that if one brought an action
against the other, a counterclaim or setoff could be set up, neither
can be deprived of the benefit thereof by assignment by the other,
or by his death, but the two (2) demands will be deemed compensated
so far as they equal each other.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 128; R.S. 1887, § 2464; R.S. 1899, § 3551; C.S. 1910, § 4397; C.S. 1920, § 5667; R.S. 1931, § 89-1022; C.S. 1945, § 3-1316; W.S. 1957, § 1-6; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

Assignment improper.—

Appellants’ assignment of the judgments to themselves as tenants in the entirety was improper because it would deprive individual appellees, holders of a cross demand, of the benefit of their claim by making the judgments held by appellants exempt from execution. Mantle v. N. Star Energy & Constr., LLC, 2020 WY 125, 473 P.3d 279,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 2020).

“Compensated” defined. —

This section represents a principle of natural justice, “compensated” therein meaning, as in the civil law, extinguished or satisfied. Dallas Dome Wyoming Oil Fields Co. v. Brooder, 55 Wyo. 109, 97 P.2d 311,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1939).

Presentation in probate unnecessary. —

Under this section counterclaim may be set up even if not presented to executor or administrator. Dallas Dome Wyoming Oil Fields Co. v. Brooder, 55 Wyo. 109, 97 P.2d 311,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1939).

Setoff not permitted. —

This section does not authorize a setoff by the maker of a note where the holder is suing the maker on a note transferred to the holder by the federal deposit insurance corporation (FDIC) after the maker's bank went into receivership and the maker seeks to offset this claim with a payment made on a separate note issued to a separate bank also in receivership to the FDIC. Gose v. Hess, 822 P.2d 846,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 204

(Wyo. 1991).

Setoff permitted.—

Appellants asserted that part of the statute that prohibited partial assignment of judgments, but corporate appellees’ partial assignments of their judgment against appellants did not deprive appellants of the benefit of their judgments against individual appellees, as appellants still received value for their judgments by having the amount appellants owed reduced. The partial assignments were valid. Mantle v. N. Star Energy & Constr., LLC, 2020 WY 125, 473 P.3d 279,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 2020).

§ 1-1-107.
Furnishing
of transcripts.

Upon request and receipt
of the lawful fees required, judges of judicial tribunals and the
clerks of every court of record, shall furnish to any person an authenticated
transcript of proceedings containing the judgment or final order in
their court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 60, § 787; R.S. 1887, § 3135; R.S. 1899, § 4255; C.S. 1910, § 5115; C.S. 1920, § 6377; R.S. 1931, § 89-4809; C.S. 1945, § 3-5309; W.S. 1957, § 1-7; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 201.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “justices of the peace and” preceding “judges of” and deleted “other” preceding “judicial.”

§ 1-1-108.
Voluntary partial payment of liability claims.

No voluntary partial
payment of a claim based on alleged liability for injury or property
damage shall be construed as an admission of fault or liability, or
as a waiver or release of claim by the person receiving payment. Such
payment is not admissible as evidence in any action for the purpose
of determining the amount of any judgment, with respect to the parties
to the occurrence from which the claim arose. Upon settlement of the
claim, the parties may make any agreement they desire in respect to
all voluntary partial payments. After entry of judgment, any such
payment shall be treated as a credit and deducted from the amount
of the judgment. If after partial voluntary payments are made it is
determined by final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction
that the payor is liable for an amount less than the voluntary payments
already made, the payor has no right of action for the recovery of
amounts by which the voluntary payments exceed the final judgment.
No voluntary partial payments shall be construed to reduce the amount
of damages which may be pleaded and proved in a court proceeding between
the parties.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-7.1; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1.

No credit for payments made by another. —

This section does not provide for a credit to a party, upon a judgment for payments made by another in settlement of the claim of an injured person. The clear legislative intent is that the voluntary payments accrue only to the benefit or detriment of the payor of the voluntary payments. The statute makes no mention of third parties who pay nothing as being either benefitted or harmed by the party paying and the injured party. Haderlie v. Sondgeroth, 866 P.2d 703,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1993).

Applied

in

Amerigas Propane, Inc. v. Bing, 875 P.2d 1276,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1994).

Law reviews. —

For discussion of Rule 409, F.R.E., which excludes offers to pay or payments of an injured party's medical expenses when offered to prove negligence by the alleged tortfeasor, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 601 (1977).